Arkansas, session 2025, SB505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-56-416 is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(d)(1) The ordinance may establish an administrative procedure for
changing the zone or district designation of a property when the request is:
(A) Made by the property owner; and
(B) Consistent with the adopted land use plan.
(2) An administrative change of a zone or district designation
under subdivision (d)(1) of this section is not subject to the requirements
under § 14-56-422 or § 14-56-423.
(3) Decisions rendered on administrative changes of a zone or
district designation under subdivision (d)(1) of this section may be appealed
to the planning commission of the municipality.
*SSS260*
03-31-2025 14:28:39 SSS260

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB505

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-56-422 is amended to read as follows:
14-56-422. Adoption of plans, ordinances, and regulations.
All Except as otherwise provided in § 14-56-416(d), all plans,
recommended ordinances, and regulations shall be adopted through the
following procedure:
(1)(A) The planning commission shall hold a public hearing on
the plans, ordinances, and regulations proposed under this subchapter.
(B) Notice of public hearing shall be published in a
newspaper of general circulation in the city at least one (1) time fifteen
(15) days prior to the hearing.
(C) Notice by first class mail to the boards of directors
of all school districts affected by a proposed plan, ordinance, or regulation
shall be provided sufficiently in advance to allow representatives of all
affected school districts a reasonable opportunity to submit comments on any
proposed plan, ordinance, or regulation;
(2) Following the public hearing, proposed plans may be adopted
and proposed ordinances and regulations may be recommended as presented or in
modified form by a majority vote of the entire commission;
(3) Following its adoption of plans and recommendation of
ordinances and regulations, the commission shall certify adopted plans or
recommended ordinances and regulations to the legislative body of the city
for its adoption;
(4) The legislative body of the city may return the plans and
recommended ordinances and regulations to the commission for further study or
recertification or by a majority vote of the entire membership may adopt by
ordinance or resolution the plans and recommended ordinances or regulations
submitted by the commission. However, nothing in this subchapter shall be
construed to limit the city council's authority to recall the ordinances and
resolutions by a vote of a majority of the council; and
(5)(A) Following adoption by the legislative body, the adopted
plans, ordinances, and regulations shall be filed in the office of the city
clerk.
(B) The city clerk shall file the plans, ordinances, and
regulations as pertain to the territory beyond the corporate limits with the
county recorder of the counties in which territorial jurisdiction is being
03-31-2025 14:28:39 SSS260

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB505
exercised.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-56-423 is amended to read as follows:
14-56-423. Change in plans, etc.
After Except as otherwise provided in § 14-56-416(d), after adoption of
plans, ordinances, and regulations and proper filing in the offices of city
clerk and county recorder, no alteration, amendment, extension, abridgement,
or discontinuance of the plans, ordinances, or regulations may be made except
in conformance with the procedure prescribed in § 14-56-422, or by a majority
vote of the city council.

/s/J. Bryant
























03-31-2025 14:28:39 SSS260